Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4229
Reduction of benefits; when.

Benefits otherwise payable under pool coverage shall be reduced by all amounts paid or payable through any other health insurance or insurance arrangement and by all hospital and medical expense benefits paid or payable under any workers' compensation coverage, automobile medical payment or liability insurance whether provided on the basis of fault or nonfault, or any state or federal law or program.

Laws 1985, LB 391, § 29.